Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB138.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "active volunteer" and "volunteer" in section 79A03 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 79A03. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Active volunteer." A volunteer for a volunteer fire company [or], nonprofit emergency medical services agency or volunteer HAZMAT Team who has complied with the requirements of the 12345678910111213141516171819 volunteer service credit program and who is certified under section 79A23 (relating to certification).* * *"HAZMAT Team." As the term "certified hazardous material response team" is defined in section 103 of the act of December 7, 1990 (P.L.639, No.165), known as the Hazardous Material Emergency Planning and Response Act.* * *"Volunteer." A member of a volunteer fire company [or], a nonprofit emergency medical services agency or a volunteer HAZMAT Team.* * *Section 2. Sections 79A21, 79A22, 79A23(a) and (c) and 79A33(1) of Title 35 are amended to read:§ 79A21. Volunteer service credit program.(a) Establishment.--The governing body may establish a volunteer service credit program that establishes the annual requirements for the certification of a volunteer in active service at a volunteer fire company [or], a nonprofit emergency medical services agency or a volunteer HAZMAT Team.(b) Activities.--The volunteer service credit program shall consider the following activities in determining credit toward a certification of active service:(1) The number of emergency calls to which a volunteer responds.(2) The level of training and participation in formal training and drills for a volunteer.(3) The total amount of time expended by a volunteer on administrative and other support services, including fundraising and facility or equipment maintenance.20250SB0138PN0084 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The involvement in other events or projects that aid the financial viability, emergency response or operational readiness of a volunteer fire company [or], a nonprofit emergency medical services agency or a volunteer HAZMAT Team.(c) Guidelines.--The governing body shall, with the advice of the chief of a volunteer fire company and the supervisor or chief of a nonprofit emergency medical services agency or the head of the volunteer HAZMAT Team or their designees, adopt guidelines, including forms and applications, necessary to implement this section.(d) Eligibility list.--A notarized list of eligible active volunteers shall be submitted to the governing body, no later than 45 days before tax notices are to be distributed, by the following:(1) The chief of a volunteer fire company, where applicable.(2) The supervisor or chief of a nonprofit emergency medical services agency, where applicable.(3) The head of a volunteer HAZMAT Team.(e) Exclusion.--An eligible active volunteer may only receive a tax credit under this subchapter once for each governing body.(f) HAZMAT.--In order to receive a tax credit under this section, an eligible active volunteer of a volunteer HAZMAT team must do all of the following:(1) Maintain HAZMAT Operations or a Technician certificate.(2) Attend a minimum of four HAZMAT drills or exercises per year.§ 79A22. Service record.20250SB0138PN0084 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Log.--The chief of a volunteer fire company [or], the supervisor or chief of a nonprofit emergency medical services agency or the head of the volunteer HAZMAT Team or their designees shall establish and maintain a service log that documents the activities of each volunteer that qualify for credit toward active service under the volunteer service credit program and the calculation of the total credits earned for each volunteer in the volunteer fire company [or], nonprofit emergency medical services agency or volunteer HAZMAT Team.(b) Review.--Service logs established and maintained by volunteer fire companies [or], nonprofit emergency medical services agencies or volunteer HAZMAT Teams shall be subject to periodic review by the commissioner, the Auditor General, the governing body where the volunteer fire company [or], nonprofit emergency medical services agency or volunteer HAZMAT Team is located and the governing body where the volunteer fire company [or], nonprofit emergency medical services agency or volunteer HAZMAT Team provides services.§ 79A23. Certification.(a) Self-certification.--The active volunteer shall sign and submit an application for certification to the chief of the volunteer fire company [or], the supervisor or chief of the nonprofit emergency medical services agency or head of the volunteer HAZMAT Team where the volunteer serves.* * *(c) Local sign-off.--The chief and another officer of the volunteer fire company [and], the supervisor or chief and another officer of the nonprofit emergency medical services agency and the head of the volunteer HAZMAT Team shall sign the application attesting to the individual's status as an active 20250SB0138PN0084 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 volunteer or that the individual can no longer serve as an active volunteer due to injury. The application shall then be forwarded to the municipality, as appropriate, for final review and processing.§ 79A33. Duties of State Fire Commissioner.The State Fire Commissioner shall:(1) Establish guidelines for municipalities, volunteer fire companies [and], nonprofit EMS agencies and volunteer HAZMAT Teams regarding the tax credit and post the guidelines online.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0138PN0084 - 5 - 123456789101112